Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.150

Refusing to perform.

No person or private medical facility may be required by law or contract in any circumstances to participate in the performance of an abortion if such person or private medical facility objects to so doing. No person may be discriminated against in employment or professional privileges because of the person's participation or refusal to participate in the termination of a pregnancy.

[ 1992 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]